Kentucky statutes. TITLE IV Judicial Branch
Interpreters

30A.400.
Interpreters — Appointment — Hearing to determine need.

If a person has been detained in police custody or has been arrested, an interpreter shall be provided prior to any interrogation or taking of a statement from the person if the court determines he meets the criteria set forth in KRS

30A.410

.

Any statement made by a person who is entitled to the services of an interpreter under subsection (1) of this section to a law enforcement officer may be used as evidence against that person only if the statement was made, offered, or elicited in the presence of a qualified interpreter. This subsection shall not deny a person the right to make a voluntary confession.

If the eligibility of the individual for an interpreter is challenged, the judge may, on good cause shown, hold a hearing to determine the bona fide need for interpreter services.

If it is determined that the person is not entitled to these services, no portion of KRS

30A.425

to

30A.435

shall apply to him.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 22, § 64, effective January 2, 1978; 1992, ch. 144, § 5, effective July 14, 1992; 1994, ch. 405, § 7, effective July 15, 1994; 1994, ch. 452, § 1, effective July 15, 1994.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

(7/15/94). This section was amended by 1994 Ky. Acts chs. 405 and 452 which do not appear to be in conflict and have been codified together.

30A.405.
Qualifications of interpreter — Standards.

Any person appointed as interpreter pursuant to this chapter shall be qualified by training or experience to interpret effectively, accurately, and impartially, both receptively and expressively, using any necessary specialized vocabulary.

The Supreme Court shall prescribe standards, such as national certification, for appointment, qualifications, duties, and other matters relating to interpreters. In the area of providing interpreters for persons who are deaf or hard of hearing as described under KRS 30A.410(1)(a), the standards shall be established after consultation with the Kentucky Commission on the Deaf and Hard of Hearing, the Kentucky Registry of Interpreters for the Deaf, and the Kentucky Association of the Deaf.

These rules and standards shall be administered by the Administrative Office of the Courts.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 22, § 65, effective January 2, 1976; 1992, ch. 144, § 6, effective July 14, 1992; 1994, ch. 452, § 2, effective July 15, 1994.

30A.410.
When interpreter shall be provided — Removal.

The court in any matter, criminal or civil, shall appoint a qualified interpreter or interpreters, to be paid out of the State Treasury, for the following categories of persons, whether they are parties, jurors, or witnesses:

Persons who because of deafness or hard of hearing:

Use sign language, such as pidgin, signed English, American Sign Language, or gestures; or

Are oral/aural and use interpreters and assistive technology,

as their primary mode of communication;

Persons who cannot communicate in English; and

Any other person who has, in the opinion of the court, another type of disability which will prevent him from properly understanding the nature of the proceedings or substantially prejudice his rights.

Upon request of the person for whom the interpreter is appointed, or on the court’s own motion, an interpreter may be removed for inability to communicate with the person, or if for reasonable cause another interpreter is so desired by the person for whom the interpreter is appointed, or because the services of an interpreter are not desired by the person.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 22, § 66, effective January 2, 1978; 1992, ch. 144, § 7, effective July 14, 1992; 1994, ch. 452, § 3, effective July 15, 1994.

30A.415.
Responsibility for payment for interpreter’s services.

In criminal or civil cases, the Court of Justice shall be responsible for payment, including ordinary and reasonable expenses, for interpretive services for court appearances.

In any case in which the interpreter is providing services out of court, even though that service relates to a pending court case, the agency requiring the services of the interpreter shall be responsible for payment.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 22, § 67, effective January 2, 1978; 1994, ch. 452, § 4, effective July 15, 1994.

30A.420.
Payment out of State Treasury.

In cases where compensation by the state is required or permitted interpreters’ fees and ordinary and reasonable expenses shall be paid out of the State Treasury according to the pay schedule of the Judicial Personnel System.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 22, § 68, effective January 2, 1978.

30A.425.
Duties of interpreter.

The duties of the interpreter may include:

Interpreting during court and court-related proceedings, including any and all meetings and conferences between client and his attorney;

Translating or interpreting documents;

Assisting in taking depositions;

Assisting in administering oaths;

Such other duties as may be required by the judge of the court making the appointment.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 22, § 69, effective January 2, 1978.

Opinions of Attorney General.

Inasmuch as the chief justice, through the administrative office of the courts, has the power to promulgate personnel policies relating to the judicial personnel system, the hours requirement applicable to state employees generally has no application to judicial personnel.

OAG 77-740

.

Research References and Practice Aids

Treatises

Caldwell’s Kentucky Form Book, 5th Ed., Practice Context for Stenographers and Interpreters, § 20.00.

30A.430.
Interpreter not to be examined as witness — Other privileged communications.

Every person who acts as an interpreter in circumstances involving the arrest, police custody or other stage in a criminal, civil, or other matter of a person coming under KRS

30A.410

shall not be examined as a witness regarding conversations between that person and his attorney, when the conversations would otherwise be subject to the attorney-client privilege, without the consent of that person. Interpreters shall not be required to testify regarding any other privileged communications without the consent of the person for whom they are interpreting.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 22, § 70, effective January 2, 1978; 1994, ch. 452, § 5, effective July 15, 1994.

Research References and Practice Aids

Treatises

Caldwell’s Kentucky Form Book, 5th Ed., Certificate to Transcript of Evidence, Form 20.03.

30A.435.
Use of equipment by interpreter or disabled person — Approval required.

In the performance of his duties the interpreter may utilize electronic recording, foreign language translation, and other equipment. A person who is deaf, hard of hearing, or speech impaired may elect to use assistive technology in lieu of or in addition to the services of an interpreter.

If the equipment sought to be used is of the type approved by the Administrative Office of the Courts, no further approval is required before the equipment may be used in court or court-related matters.

If the equipment is of a type for which no approval has been issued by the Administrative Office of the Courts, the use of the equipment for court or court-related matter shall be approved in writing and in advance by the director of the Administrative Office of the Courts or his designee or by the judge making the appointment.

If the equipment is of a type which has been disapproved by the Administrative Office of the Courts, it shall not be used in any court or court-related matter.

All equipment utilized in court or court-related matters shall be in proper mechanical and working order and shall be fit for the intended use.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 22, § 71, effective January 2, 1978; 1994, ch. 452, § 6, effective July 15, 1994.